Vermont, session 2025-2026, H668.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2454a is amended to read:
§ 2454a. CONSUMER CONTRACTS; AUTOMATIC RENEWAL
(a) A contract between a consumer and a seller or a lessor with an initial
term of one year month or longer that renews for a subsequent term that is
longer than one month shall not renew automatically unless:
VT LEG #386357 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.668
2026 Page 2 of 3
(1) the contract states clearly and conspicuously the terms of the
automatic renewal provision in plain, unambiguous language in bold-face type;
(2) in addition to accepting the contract, the consumer takes an
affirmative action to opt in to the automatic renewal provision; and
(3) if the consumer opts in to the automatic renewal provision, the seller
or lessor provides a written or electronic notice to the consumer:
(A) not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days before the
earliest of:
(i) the automatic renewal date;
(ii) the termination date; or
(iii) the date by which the consumer must provide notice to cancel
the contract; and
(B) that includes:
(i) the date the contract will terminate and a clear statement that
the contract will renew automatically unless the consumer cancels the contract
on or before the termination date; and
(ii) the length and any additional terms of the renewal period.
(b) A seller or lessor under a contract subject to subsection (a) of this
section shall:
(1) provide to the consumer a toll-free telephone number, e-mail email
address, a postal address if the seller or lessor directly bills the consumer, or
VT LEG #386357 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.668
2026 Page 3 of 3
another cost-effective, timely, and easy-to-use mechanism for canceling the
contract; and
(2) if the consumer accepted the contract online, permit the consumer to
terminate the contract exclusively online in the same manner as, similar
manner to, or a manner that is more easily available to the consumer than
acceptance of the contract, which may include a termination e-mail email
formatted and provided by the seller or lessor that the consumer can send
without additional information.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386357 v.1